District of Columbia statutes.
34-2709

Emergency excavation or demolition.

Compliance with the notice requirements of § 34-2704 shall not be required for an emergency excavation or demolition involving an imminent danger to life, health, or property; provided, that reasonable precautions have been taken to protect underground facilities. The appropriate public utility operators shall, in any event, be notified directly and as soon as possible. An imminent danger to life, health, or property exists whenever there is a substantial likelihood that loss of life, health, or property will result before the procedures under § 34-2704 can be fully complied with.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-129, § 10, 28 DCR 264
This section is referenced in § 34-2704.
1981 Ed., § 43-1709.